bulgarian.affix
flag *R:
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРАТ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЕ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЕЙКИ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЕЛИ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЕЛИТЕ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЕМ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЕТЕ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЕШ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЕШЕ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЕЩИ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЕЩИТЕ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРИ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЯЛ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЯЛА
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЯЛАТА
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЯЛИЯ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЯЛИЯТ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЯЛО
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЯЛОТО
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЯХ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЯХА
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЯХМЕ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЯХТЕ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЯЩ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЯЩА
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЯЩАТА
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЯЩИЯ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЯЩИЯТ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЯЩО
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,ЕРЯЩОТО
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,РА
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,РАЛ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,РАЛА
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,РАЛАТА
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,РАЛИ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,РАЛИТЕ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,РАЛИЯ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,РАЛИЯТ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,РАЛО
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,РАЛОТО
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,РАН
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,РАНА
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,РАНАТА
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,РАНИ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,РАНИТЕ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,РАНИЯ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,РАНИЯТ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,РАНО
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,РАНОТО
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,РАХ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,РАХА
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,РАХМЕ
    Е Р А    >      -ЕРА,РАХТЕ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЙКИ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЛ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЛА
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЛАТА
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЛИ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЛИТЕ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЛИЯ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЛИЯТ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЛО
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЛОТО
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕМ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕТЕ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕХ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕХА
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕХМЕ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕХТЕ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕШ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕШЕ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЩ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЩА
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЩАТА
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЩИ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЩИТЕ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЩИЯ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЩИЯТ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЩО
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЩОТО
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЙ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЙТЕ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЛИ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЛИТЕ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЛИЯ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЛИЯТ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕНИ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕНИТЕ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЯТ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,Я
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯЛ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯЛА
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯЛАТА
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯЛО
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯЛОТО
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯН
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯНА
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯНАТА
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯНИЯ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯНИЯТ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯНО
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯНОТО
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯХ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯХА
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯХМЕ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯХТЕ
    Ш А      >      -ША,СА
    Ш А      >      -ША,САЛ
    Ш А      >      -ША,САЛА
    Ш А      >      -ША,САЛАТА
    Ш А      >      -ША,САЛИ
    Ш А      >      -ША,САЛИТЕ
    Ш А      >      -ША,САЛИЯ
    Ш А      >      -ША,САЛИЯТ
    Ш А      >      -ША,САЛО
    Ш А      >      -ША,САЛОТО
    Ш А      >      -ША,САН
    Ш А      >      -ША,САНА
    Ш А      >      -ША,САНАТА
    Ш А      >      -ША,САНИ
    Ш А      >      -ША,САНИТЕ
    Ш А      >      -ША,САНИЯ
    Ш А      >      -ША,САНИЯТ
    Ш А      >      -ША,САНО
    Ш А      >      -ША,САНОТО
    Ш А      >      -ША,САХ
    Ш А      >      -ША,САХА
    Ш А      >      -ША,САХМЕ
    Ш А      >      -ША,САХТЕ
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШАТ
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕ
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕЙКИ
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕЛ
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕЛА
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕЛАТА
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕЛИ
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕЛИТЕ
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕЛИЯ
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕЛИЯТ
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕЛО
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕЛОТО
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕМ
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕТЕ
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕХ
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕХА
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕХМЕ
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕХТЕ
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕШ
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕШЕ
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕЩ
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕЩА
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕЩАТА
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕЩИ
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕЩИТЕ
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕЩИЯ
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕЩИЯТ
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕЩО
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШЕЩОТО
    Ш А      >      -ША,ШИ

flag *S:
    А М      >      -АМ,А
    А М      >      -АМ,АЙ
    А М      >      -АМ,АЙКИ
    А М      >      -АМ,АЙТЕ
    А М      >      -АМ,АЛ
    А М      >      -АМ,АЛА
    А М      >      -АМ,АЛАТА
    А М      >      -АМ,АЛИ
    А М      >      -АМ,АЛИТЕ
    А М      >      -АМ,АЛИЯ
    А М      >      -АМ,АЛИЯТ
    А М      >      -АМ,АЛО
    А М      >      -АМ,АЛОТО
    А М      >      -АМ,АМЕ
    А М      >      -АМ,АН
    А М      >      -АМ,АНА
    А М      >      -АМ,АНАТА
    А М      >      -АМ,АНИ
    А М      >      -АМ,АНИТЕ
    А М      >      -АМ,АНИЯ
    А М      >      -АМ,АНИЯТ
    А М      >      -АМ,АНО
    А М      >      -АМ,АНОТО
    А М      >      -АМ,АТ
    А М      >      -АМ,АТЕ
    А М      >      -АМ,АХ
    А М      >      -АМ,АХА
    А М      >      -АМ,АХМЕ
    А М      >      -АМ,АХТЕ
    А М      >      -АМ,АШ
    А М      >      -АМ,АШЕ
    А М      >      -АМ,АЩ
    А М      >      -АМ,АЩА
    А М      >      -АМ,АЩАТА
    А М      >      -АМ,АЩИ
    А М      >      -АМ,АЩИТЕ
    А М      >      -АМ,АЩИЯ
    А М      >      -АМ,АЩИЯТ
    А М      >      -АМ,АЩО
    А М      >      -АМ,АЩОТО
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЙКИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕШЕ
    Я        >      -Я,И
    Я        >      -Я,ИМ
    Я        >      -Я,ИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ИШ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛА
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛО
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛОТО
    Я        >      -Я,ЯН
    Я        >      -Я,ЯНА
    Я        >      -Я,ЯНАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ЯНИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯНИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯНО
    Я        >      -Я,ЯНОТО
    Я        >      -Я,ЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯХ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯХА
    Я        >      -Я,ЯХМЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯХТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩА
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩО
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩОТО
