bulgarian.dict
акумулирам/S
апретирам/S
баданосвам/S
безразсъдствувам/S
белея/R
беснея/R
бледнея/R
блокирам/S
богатея/R
бранувам/S
бъкам/S
българея/R
вглеждам/S
ветрея/R
вживея/R
взаимствам/S
вилнея/R
вкопчвам/S
вкочанея/R
влажнея/R
внушавам/S
вонея/R
връцкам/S
втривам/S
вцепенея/R
въвонея/R
възгласявам/S
възползвам/S
въртя/S
глобявам/S
говея/R
голея/R
гражданея/R
грознея/R
грохвам/S
гъстея/R
дебаркирам/S
декомпресирам/S
дера/R
деребействувам/S
дисимилирам/S
добера/R
довея/R
догневявам/S
додера/R
доживея/R
доизпиша/R
доизчаквам/S
домъчнея/R
донапълвам/S
дооздравея/R
допилея/R
допълзявам/S
доразбера/R
досъхвам/S
дотлея/R
драматизирам/S
дъртея/R
дюдюкам/S
елиминирам/S
ергенея/R
живея/R
живявам/S
забелея/R
заблея/R
заболея/R
заборчлея/R
забременявам/S
забърша/R
завиждам/S
завонея/R
загледам/S
загрея/R
загърмявам/S
задера/R
задърпам/S
зажаднея/R
зажълтея/R
заизмъквам/S
заклинвам/S
закопнея/R
закостенея/R
закупувам/S
закъснея/R
залинея/R
залитам/S
залюлея/R
замирам/S
замириша/R
замъждея/R
занемявам/S
запаша/R
запечатам/S
запилея/R
заповядам/S
заприклякам/S
запустея/R
запявам/S
зарозовея/R
заръфам/S
засинея/R
заслонявам/S
застарея/R
застъпвам/S
затлея/R
заточавам/S
затуптявам/S
затъмнея/R
затъпея/R
захлаждам/S
захубавея/R
зачерпвам/S
зачеша/R
заядам/S
зеленея/R
идвам/S
избеднея/R
избера/R
изблея/R
избутам/S
изветрея/R
извисявам/S
изгаснея/R
изгледам/S
изглупея/R
издействувам/S
издера/R
издържам/S
изжаднея/R
изкалъпвам/S
изкосявам/S
изкуфея/R
излайвам/S
измачквам/S
измириша/R
изневерявам/S
изнемощея/R
изпасвам/S
изпилея/R
изплъзвам/S
изподера/R
изпонадупчвам/S
изпречвам/S
изпълзя/S
изреша/R
изронвам/S
изскърцвам/S
изсмея/R
изтикам/S
изтрезнея/R
изтупам/S
изумея/R
изхайлазвам/S
изцвилвам/S
изчеша/R
изшумявам/S
инициализирам/S
инхибирам/S
капарирам/S
квакам/S
киселея/R
клъцвам/S
комплектувам/S
контролирам/S
коравея/R
краставея/R
крещя/S
кусвам/S
леденея/R
лепвам/S
линея/R
лутам/S
люлея/R
марля/S
милея/R
минирам/S
младея/R
момея/R
мукам/S
мъдрея/R
мъждея/R
мършавея/R
мъчнея/R
набеснея/R
наблъсквам/S
навесвам/S
навлажнея/R
нагазвам/S
нагрея/R
нагрухам/S
надделея/R
надера/R
наджасквам/S
надживея/R
надпиша/R
надпявам/S
надъхам/S
наедрея/R
назрея/R
накадявам/S
наковлаждам/S
накривея/R
налокам/S
намалея/R
намотавам/S
напатвам/S
напера/R
напойвам/S
напълнея/R
напътствам/S
насаждам/S
насмея/R
насмитам/S
насъсквам/S
натежнея/R
натръскам/S
нахождам/S
нашепвам/S
немея/R
неутрализирам/S
обгръщам/S
обезправявам/S
обезумея/R
облагодетелствам/S
облея/R
оборвам/S
обточвам/S
обърша/R
овехтея/R
овлажнея/R
овършавам/S
оглупея/R
огрея/R
одрипавея/R
одрънквам/S
ожаднея/R
оздравея/R
оземлявам/S
оковавам/S
окраставея/R
окъснея/R
окъсявам/S
олюлея/R
омаломощея/R
омръзвам/S
онемея/R
опирам/S
оплешивея/R
опоскам/S
опротивея/R
опълчвам/S
оредея/R
освидетелствувам/S
освирепея/R
ослепея/R
оснежавам/S
остарея/R
отбягвам/S
отговея/R
отелвам/S
отеснея/R
откъртвам/S
отлея/R
отмилея/R
оторизирам/S
отпера/R
отрезвея/R
отрезнявам/S
оттласкам/S
отъпея/R
отядам/S
оцелея/R
очуквам/S
ошугавея/R
парфюмирам/S
пилея/R
пирувам/S
пламенея/R
плискам/S
побелея/R
побеснея/R
поблея/R
поболявам/S
повеселея/R
повръщам/S
погрейвам/S
погрея/R
подбера/R
подграждам/S
подгрея/R
подкрепявам/S
подлудея/R
подокарвам/S
подпаша/R
подразбера/R
подрипвам/S
подстригвам/S
поевтинея/R
поеснафчвам/S
пожълтея/R
позабогатея/R
позагрея/R
позаеквам/S
позакоравея/R
позапиша/R
позастарея/R
позастудявам/S
поизбелея/R
поизгладнея/R
поиздърпвам/S
поизпера/R
поизсилвам/S
поизтънея/R
поклюкарствувам/S
поливам/S
полудея/R
помайвам/S
помириша/R
помътнея/R
понабрулвам/S
понагрея/R
понаедрея/R
понакиселея/R
понакиселявам/S
понамириша/R
понапълнея/R
понапълнявам/S
пониквам/S
поогладнея/R
пооголея/R
пооживея/R
поокопитвам/S
поопаша/R
поопиша/R
поослушам/S
поостарея/R
поотмалея/R
поотракам/S
поохладнея/R
попогледам/S
попрепиша/R
поприпквам/S
поразгневявам/S
поразтъпквам/S
поруменея/R
посвестявам/S
посивея/R
поскъпнея/R
пославянчвам/S
посребрея/R
постоянствувам/S
потресвам/S
потъмнея/R
поумнявам/S
почаквам/S
почервенея/R
почеша/R
пощурея/R
правоимам/S
пребърша/R
преваждам/S
прегорявам/S
прегрея/R
предначертавам/S
прежаднея/R
прежаднявам/S
прежъднея/R
преизбера/R
прекарвам/S
прелъгвам/S
пренасищам/S
препаша/R
препитавам/S
препявам/S
пресмятам/S
престарея/R
претакам/S
преучвам/S
прибирам/S
пригрея/R
прикипявам/S
примокрея/R
припламвам/S
притурвам/S
причернея/R
провървявам/S
продера/R
прокънтя/S
пропиша/R
проскърцвам/S
прояждам/S
пълнея/R
разбеснея/R
разбогатявам/S
развиделея/R
разговявам/S
разгрея/R
разквартирувам/S
разлюлея/R
размитам/S
разпиша/R
разпращя/S
разсъхвам/S
разхлопвам/S
разхубавея/R
революционизирам/S
розовея/R
ръгам/S
ръждавея/R
самоуспокоявам/S
свъртя/S
сгрея/R
скалъпвам/S
слабея/R
слетя/S
сопам/S
спиша/R
сприятелявам/S
старея/R
стресвам/S
счукам/S
съдера/R
съседствам/S
тежнея/R
торпилирам/S
тъмнея/R
тюхкам/S
уйдисам/S
умалея/R
упътвам/S
утежнея/R
учетворявам/S
хайманувам/S
хубавея/R
цакам/S
чифтосам/S
чуждея/R
щампосам/S
щръклея/R
